Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.050

Postharvest test protocol.

The department must develop a postharvest test protocol for testing hemp under this chapter that includes testing of whole plant samples or other testing protocol identified in regulations established by the United States department of agriculture, including the testing procedures for delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of hemp produced by producers under the state plan.

[ 2019 c 158 s 5.]